Louisiana, session 2026, HB333.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:824(A) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 15:824(E) is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§824. Commitment of persons to the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary In accordance with
Subsection E of this Section, any individual subject to confinement in a state adult
penal or correctional institution shall be committed to the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections and not to any particular institution within the jurisdiction of
the department. The secretary of the department may transfer an inmate from one
such facility to another, insofar as the transfer is consistent with the commitment and
in accordance with treatment, training, and security needs established by the
department.
* * *
E. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the department shall
not house an inmate more than thirty miles outside either of the following locations:
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-936 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 333
(1) The parish where the criminal offense occurred or where the inmate was
convicted.
(2) The parish where the residence or domicile of the inmate is located.